Tennessee, session 114, HB1353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-16-510(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(a)
(1) A person commits an offense who harms or threatens to harm an
individual involved in the judicial process or a family member of such person with
the intent to impede, intimidate, interfere with, or retaliate against the individual in
connection with the individual's participation in the judicial process.
(2) As used in subdivision (a)(1):
(A) "Family member" means an individual's spouse, parent,
grandparent, stepparent, child, grandchild, stepchild, sibling, half-sibling,
or spouse's parents; and
(B) "Individual involved in the judicial process" means:
(i) A witness;
(ii) A judge or former judge;
(iii) An employee of the court;
(iv) A district attorney general;
(v) An assistant district attorney general;
(vi) An employee of the district attorney general;
(vii) A law enforcement officer;
HB1353
003163
- 1 -

(viii) A clerk;
(ix) An employee of the clerk;
(x) A juror or former juror;
(xi) A district public defender;
(xii) An assistant district public defender; or
(xiii) An employee of the district public defender.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003163